Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 15

State Building Commission

4-15-101. Creation — Membership — Terms.

There is created a state building commission composed of seven (7) ex officio members who shall be the governor, the secretary of state, the comptroller of the treasury, the state treasurer, the commissioner of finance and administration, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives.

The governor shall serve as chair and the commission shall elect from its membership a vice chair and secretary.

The attorney general and reporter shall serve as legal counsel to the commission in accordance with the requirements of § 8-6-301.

In the event that the voting membership of any ex officio members is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or invalid, they shall continue as ex officio nonvoting members, and in addition, the senate and house of representatives shall by joint resolution appoint another person or persons to be a voting member or members.

Acts 1955, ch. 304, § 1; 1967, ch. 111, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1501; Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 2; 1982, ch. 810, § 5; 1982, ch. 915, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1982, ch. 915, § 2, provided: “If any clause, words, provisions or sections of this act, including any provisions for the membership of the commission, are found to be unconstitutional or invalid, it is the intent of the general assembly that the remainder of this act be upheld and that the commission continue to function with the remainder of the membership not held to be unconstitutional or invalid.”

Compiler's Notes. The state building commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§4-29-112,4-29-247.

Acts 2014, ch. 945, § 3 provided that the state building commission shall appear before the joint government operations subcommittee on judiciary and government no later than December 31, 2014, to update the subcommittee on the status of the issues raised in the commission's 2013 governmental entity review hearing.

Cross-References. Review prior to demolishing, altering or transferring historically, architecturally or culturally significant state property, §4-11-111.

4-15-102. Powers and duties.

The commission has the power and authority, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, to approve and supervise all projects involving:

Any improvement to real property funded by public or private funds or both in which the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies has an interest;

The demolition of any building or structure located on real property in which the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies has an interest, or the demolition of any building or structure by a foundation created for the primary purpose of benefiting the University of Tennessee or any institution of the state university and community college system of Tennessee, provided such building or structure when constructed or acquired was originally approved by the commission pursuant to this section, except for the demolition of any building or structure acquired by the department of transportation for highway rights-of-way; and

Any improvement to real property in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) by a foundation created for the primary purpose of benefiting the University of Tennessee or any institution of the state university and community college system of Tennessee, the operation of which will be, or is intended by the foundation to be or become, the responsibility of the University of Tennessee or any institution of the state university and community college system of Tennessee. The intent of the foundation to retain operation of the improvement or to transfer operations to the state shall be contained in the records of the foundation.

No contract for the improvement of real property in which the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies has an interest, and no contract for the demolition of any building or structure on real property in which the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies has an interest shall be awarded until the plans therefor have been submitted to and approved by the commission.

This subsection (b) shall not apply to the demolition of any building or structure acquired by the department of transportation for highway rights-of-way.

This subsection (b) shall apply to improvements or demolitions of any building or structure approved by the commission pursuant to this section by a foundation created for the primary purpose of benefiting the University of Tennessee or any institution of the state university and community college system of Tennessee.

The commission, using procedures that promote competition to the greatest extent possible, has the power and authority to advertise and award contracts relating to the projects described in subsection (a), including contracts for construction, erection or demolition and contracts to furnish, install or provide goods or materials that are incidental to projects that are within the jurisdiction of the commission.

The commission also has the power and authority to award contracts for professional design, surveying or planning services relating to the projects described in subsection (a), following procedures of the commission.

This subsection (c) shall not apply to contracts made by the department of transportation pursuant to title 54, chapter 5.

Any rule, regulation, specification or policy of the commission promulgated pursuant to this subsection (c) that restricts eligibility to bid on a project to the manufacturer of the material to be utilized in such project shall be waived, if in the discretion of the commission:

The person, company, corporation or other entity submitting a bid offers a warranty or guarantee substantially equivalent to the warranty or guarantee offered by the manufacturer; and

The person, company, corporation or other entity submitting such bid is financially capable of performing such warranty or guarantee.

The following transactions shall be subject to approval by the state building commission, in addition to the other approvals required by law:

The acquisition of any interest in real property by the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies, except for the acquisition of any interest in real property by the department of transportation for highway rights-of-way;

The disposal of any interest in surplus real property described in § 12-2-112; provided, that:

The commission may establish policies that permit the disposal, without approval by the commission, of interests in surplus real property other than the fee interest, including, but not limited to, leases, easements and rights-of-way; and

Such policies that permit the disposal of any interest, without the approval by the commission, shall not include disposal or conveyance in any manner of any interest or rights in minerals, coal, natural gas, oil, timber and any other energy related resources;

All leases described in § 12-2-115(b); and

All leases or other contracts that may involve the use of private funds for the proposed construction and that relate to improvements to real property in which the state or any of its departments, institutions or agencies have an interest.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, subdivision (d)(1) shall not apply to the University of Tennessee and the state university and community college system of Tennessee in the acquisition and disposal of any interest in real property acquired by gift or devise, unless the acquisition of any interest in real property by gift or devise obligates the University of Tennessee, the state university and community college system of Tennessee, or the state to expend state funds for capital improvements or continuing operating expenditures. Furthermore, information on such gift property will be filed with the commission.

It is the duty of the office of legislative services to notify each member of the general assembly who requests such notification of any particular project to be considered by the commission, which project is proposed to be located within the district represented by the particular senator or representative.

Such notification shall be given by mail not less than five (5) days prior to the commission meeting at which the subject project will be considered, unless it is an emergency meeting of the commission, in which case notification shall be made to the legislators as quickly as feasible.

The commission may award and approve contracts that provide for retainage as follows: not more than ninety-five percent (95%) of the contract price shall be paid on any contract until it is completed and the work is accepted; provided, that such contracts are with reputable building contractors who are principally located within this state and who have demonstrated by past experience their ability to properly perform equivalent building construction or improvement projects, whether public or private.

Prior to the execution of any such contract in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the commission shall require the execution of a good and solvent corporate surety payment and performance bond in an amount to be determined by the commission.

Such bond shall be sufficient in amount to secure the faithful and satisfactory completion of the state building or improvement project and payment for all labor and materials used by the contractor, or any immediate or remote subcontractor under the contract.

Any damages caused by a building contractor for failure to complete the contract or by failing to satisfactorily complete the work shall be recoverable by the state in an action against the building contractor and the building contractor's sureties.

Full settlement may be made with the contractor after the following have occurred:

The contractor shall furnish evidence to satisfy the commission that all the material used by the contractor, the contractor's subcontractors or the contractor's agents has been fully paid for and all laborers and other employees working for the contractor, the contractor's subcontractors, or the contractor's agents have been fully paid; and

Within ten (10) days after receipt of evidence requested in subdivision (g)(1), the commission shall provide thirty (30) days notice in some newspaper published in the county where the work is done, if there is a newspaper published there, and if not, in a newspaper in an adjoining county, that settlement is about to be made and notifying all claimants to file notice of their claims with the commission, and the period for filing shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the last published notice.

Except as provided in chapter 13, part 1 of this title, this chapter shall have no application to property conveyed in trust to a private corporation organized and chartered under the laws of this state pursuant to § 4-13-101.

Whenever the commissioner of education is authorized by the state board of education to take responsibility for the operation of any local school system or school that has been placed on probation pursuant to title 49, chapter 1, part 6, the state building commission shall have the same authority granted by this chapter relative to state agencies for all expenditures of educational capital outlay funds for such local school system or school.

Acts 1955, ch. 304, § 2; modified; Acts 1976, ch. 679, §§ 1-3; 1977, ch. 89, § 22; T.C.A., § 4-1502; Acts 1980, ch. 591, § 1; 1980, ch. 741, § 3; 1981, ch. 195, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; Acts 1983, ch. 192, § 1; 1983, ch. 273, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 893, § 8; 1997, ch. 402, §§ 14, 15; 1998, ch. 737, § 1; 2001, ch. 331, §§ 1-3.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of Tennessee Board of Regents and the University of Memphis to enter into Student Housing Affiliation Agreement with LLC to construct and operate residential facility for use of University students, faculty and staff on property adjacent to campus. OAG 13-91, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 92 (11/20/13).

4-15-103. Expenses of commission members — Administrative personnel — State architect.

The members of the commission shall serve without additional compensation, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for their necessary expenses. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The commission shall have such administrative personnel as are necessary to carry out its purpose and charge, who shall be attached to the department of treasury for administrative purposes. The personnel shall be subject to personnel policies and regulations which are applicable to employees of the department of treasury, such as leave, compensation, classification, and travel requests.

The commission has the authority to employ, terminate, control and establish the compensation of, the state architect. The state treasurer has the authority to employ, terminate, control and set the compensation of, all other personnel of the commission. The state treasurer shall consult with members of the commission prior to taking any personnel action.

Acts 1955, ch. 304, § 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(16); T.C.A., § 4-1503; Acts 2017, ch. 87, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-15-104. Rules and regulations for construction.

The commission is authorized to prescribe standards and promulgate rules and regulations for the construction of state buildings, and the procedure to be followed with respect thereto.

The commission is encouraged to prescribe high performance building requirements and other standards, and promulgate rules and regulations, which meet or exceed the 2005 sustainable design guidelines that the commission implemented, that are necessary to ensure all state buildings perform in an energy efficient manner.

Notwithstanding subsection (b), the commission shall not prescribe any high performance building requirement or any other standard, nor promulgate any rules and regulations, which require or permit any wood products harvested or manufactured in this state, or any wood products designed or manufactured by a forest products company that is headquartered in this state, to be in any way less preferred in the design and construction of state buildings than any wood products harvested or manufactured outside this state, or to be in any way less preferred than any other wood products grown or harvested in this state, that have been certified or graded by any certifying or grading association or agency, including, but not limited to, the Sustainable Forestry Initiative, the American Tree Farm System, or the Forest Stewardship Council.

Acts 1955, ch. 304, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-1504; Acts 2008, ch. 905, § 1; 2013, ch. 363, § 1.

4-15-105. Bidding in large counties — Bidding in East and West Tennessee.

The commission is hereby authorized to permit bids invited by officials, departments, institutions and agencies of the state for building construction or improvements, to be performed or done in counties having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census, to be received and publicly opened in the county at a previously announced place and time by a representative of the state, and that such representative to receive and open the bids may be, but is not limited to, a duly licensed architect or engineer designated by the state.

The commission is authorized to permit bids invited by officials, departments, institutions and agencies of the state for building construction or improvements, to be performed or done in the eastern or western grand division, to be received and publicly opened in such grand division at a previously announced place and time by a representative of the state. Such bids shall be received and opened in the cities of Chattanooga or Knoxville, or the Tri-Cities area for the eastern grand division and in Shelby County or the city of Jackson for the western grand division.

Acts 1969, ch. 285, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-1505; Acts 1982, ch. 770, § 1; 1986, ch. 512, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-15-106. Enforcement of other statutes.

It is the duty and responsibility of the commission to enforce the Tennessee Public Buildings Accessibility Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 120, part 2, as to all public buildings owned or leased by the state or any department, institution or agency thereof, and any subsequent acts that require specific construction or design specifications, techniques or objectives for such state public buildings.

It is also the duty and responsibility of the commission to enforce the code for energy conservation in new building construction, compiled in title 13, chapter 19, as to all buildings designed or constructed for the state of Tennessee after January 1, 1979. Such enforcement shall be accomplished by requiring the designing architect or engineer and the construction contractor to certify that the design and construction of the building for which each is responsible is in conformity with the requirements of title 13, chapter 19. The staff of the commission shall review such design or construction to verify compliance. Responsibility for proper design of the structure shall remain with the designing architect or engineer, even though the staff of the commission has conducted the review and approval process of the project documents.

In addition to the requirements for new buildings to meet the code for energy conservation, as compiled in title 13, chapter 19, the staff of the commission shall review any recommended energy conservation proposals and make recommendations to the commission for inclusion of these proposals in projects where deemed feasible.

The state architect or the state architect's designee shall allocate the energy efficient commercial building tax deduction codified in 26 U.S.C. § 179D to the party primarily responsible for designing the property in accordance with internal revenue service tax provisions. This party shall distribute all or part of this deduction to other parties responsible for design or installation of energy efficient commercial systems used to obtain such tax credit. This authority is retroactive, pursuant to applicable internal revenue service tax guidelines. If the property is financed with bonds issued by the state, no energy efficient commercial building tax deduction shall be awarded without approval of bond counsel.

Acts 1978, ch. 905, § 1; 1979, ch. 403, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-1506; Acts 1991, ch. 498, § 7; 2012, ch. 1083, § 1.

4-15-107. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the state building commission;

“Improvement to real property” means:

The construction or erection of new buildings or structures in which the state of Tennessee or any of its departments, institutions or agencies have an interest, whether financed by public or private funds or both;

The major maintenance of any building or structure in which the state of Tennessee or any of its departments, institutions or agencies have an interest; or

The renovation of any building or structure in which the state of Tennessee or any of its departments, institutions or agencies have an interest;

“Major maintenance” means the repair or renovation of any building or structure or any portion thereof in which the state of Tennessee or any of its departments, institutions or agencies have an interest and that is being funded by direct appropriations for major maintenance or that will cost in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); and

“Renovation” means the change in the functional use or operation of space in existing buildings or structures in which the state of Tennessee or any of its departments, institutions or agencies have an interest.

Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 1; 1986, ch. 631, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of Tennessee Board of Regents and the University of Memphis to enter into Student Housing Affiliation Agreement with LLC to construct and operate residential facility for use of University students, faculty and staff on property adjacent to campus. OAG 13-91, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 92 (11/20/13).